New Jersey, session 222, A2903.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For any public school district that has, since the enactment of P.L.2018, c.67 (C.18A:7F-67 et al.), borrowed funds from the State for the purpose of supplementing its general fund budget, the Commissioner of Education and the State Treasurer, as appropriate, shall forgive up to $10,000,000 of the outstanding balance owed to the State as of the date of enactment of this act.  In the case of a school district that has applied to the commissioner to borrow funds prior to the date of enactment of this act, the commissioner and the treasurer shall, upon approval of the application, issue the amount in full to the school district and forgive up to $10,000,000 of the borrowed funds. b.  For purposes of this section, borrowed funds shall include loans from the State that were provided to a school district for the purpose of supplementing its general fund budget and advanced State aid payments provided to a district pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2006, c.15 (C.18A:7A-56), and any interest on these funds or fees associated with the funds. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.